Hawaii statutes.
§445-24 Fictitious bids. At any
auction sale it shall be unlawful for any person to procure any person to make
fictitious bids, or to conspire with any person to make any fictitious bid, or
knowingly to permit any person to make a fictitious bid; or for any auctioneer
fictitiously to raise any bid oneself; or for any person to act as a by-bidder,
or what is commonly known as a "capper", "booster", or
"shiller", or offer to make any false or fictitious bid, or pretend
to bid for, or pretend to buy, any article sold or offered for sale. [L 1925, c
195, pt of §1; RL 1935, §2420; RL 1945, §7021; RL 1955, §155-21; HRS §445-24;
gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Seller in auction not having held out that highest bid would
be accepted is not bound by it. 5 H. 325 (1885).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next